Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 6
OTHER COURT OFFICERS — COORDINATOR OF COURTS

Section.

§ 1-601. Reference to code provisions concerning other court officers.

Other officers of courts are the clerks of the district courts; stenographic reports [reporters], and the crier, bailiff and messenger of the Supreme Court. The office, bond, fees and general duties of the clerks of the district courts are provided for elsewhere in this code, and the appointment, compensation and duties of the other officers mentioned in this section are provided for in the Code of Civil Procedure and the Penal Code.

§ 1-602 — 1-610. [Reserved.]

There is hereby established the office of the administrative director of the courts of the state of Idaho. The Supreme Court shall appoint and fix the compensation of the administrative director, he to devote his full time to the duties of such office and to serve at the pleasure of the court.

§ 1-611. Administrative director of courts — Appointment by Supreme Court — Term — Compensation.

There is hereby established the office of the administrative director of the courts of the state of Idaho. The Supreme Court shall appoint and fix the compensation of the administrative director, he to devote his full time to the duties of such office and to serve at the pleasure of the court.

§ 1-612. Duties of administrative director.

The administrative director, acting under the supervision and direction of the supreme court, shall:

Procure data from time to time and as of the close of each fiscal year with respect to these matters: the business transacted by the various courts of Idaho; the state of their dockets; the needs, if any, for assistance to expedite the handling of judicial business pending in the courts; and such other matters as, in the judgment of the supreme court, bear on the work and the administration of the judicial system of the state.

Report to the supreme court from time to time concerning the need for assistance in the handling of pending business in any court of Idaho, and recommended means for meeting the need.

Report to the supreme court and the governor for each fiscal year, as of the close of the year, concerning the data procured as provided in subsection (a) of this section and as to the work of the administrative director’s office, one (1) copy of each report to be made public by filing with the clerk of the supreme court, one (1) to be furnished to the board of commissioners of the Idaho state bar, and one (1) to the legislative counsel; and report to the supreme court on these data at such other times as may be requested by the chief justice.

Examine the administrative and business methods and systems employed in the offices of the judges, clerks and other officers of the courts related to and serving the courts, and make recommendations to the supreme court for improvement.

Formulate and submit to the supreme court recommendations for the improvement of the judicial system.

§ 1-613. Judicial assistance needed in given district — Assignment of judge.

Whenever the administrative director’s report indicates that there is need for judicial assistance in any court, the Supreme Court shall assign to that court any judge for a fixed period or for specific purposes. Any judge so assigned shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be paid all reasonable expenses actually incurred by him in the performance of his duties hereunder, including reasonable expenses of travel and sustenance when required to perform duties outside the city of his residence.

§ 1-614. Judges and clerks of courts — Duties — Access to records.

The judges, clerks and other officers of the courts shall comply with the requests made by the administrative director for the inspection, standardization, and improvement of the records and systems employed in the offices of the judges, clerks and other officers of the courts, in furtherance of section 1-612, Idaho Code.

It shall be the duty of the judges, clerks and other officers of the courts, when requested by the administrative director, to report promptly on all matters within the scope of (a) of section 1-612, Idaho Code, on which a report is requested. The administrative director shall have access to the official records of the judge, clerk and other officers of any court at all reasonable times in the performance of his duties under this act.

§ 1-615. Supreme Court may provide assistants — Clerical assistance.

The Supreme Court may provide such assistants and clerical assistance to the administrative director as may be deemed necessary to perform the duties and responsibilities imposed on him by this act.